Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-601.03
Caucus; additional filings.

The provisions of sections 17-601.01 to 17-601.03 shall not preclude in any manner any person from filing for the offices to which such sections are applicable, either by direct filing or by petition.

Laws 1971, LB 432, § 3.